Maryland, session 2026, SB0109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
10–204.6.
(a) Notwithstanding Subtitle 1 of this title, the governing body of Anne Arundel
County may authorize, by law, a payment deferral of the county property tax for residential
real property occupied as the principal residence of the owner, the provisions of which shall
comply with the provisions of subsections (b) through (h) of this section.
(b) An owner is eligible for a payment deferral under subsection (a) of this section
if the owner or at least one of the owners:
(1) has resided in the dwelling for a period of at least 5 consecutive years;
(2) (i) is at least 62 years of age;
– 1 –

Ch. 690 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) has been found permanently and totally disabled and has
qualified for benefits under:
1. the Social Security Act;
2. the Railroad Retirement Act;
3. any federal act for [members of the United States armed
forces] SERVICE MEMBERS; or
4. any federal retirement system; or
(iii) has been found permanently and totally disabled by a county
health officer or the Baltimore City Commissioner of Health; and
(3) meets the income eligibility requirements determined under subsection
(c) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –